Utah statutes.
77-24a-4.   Locating owner.
The local law enforcement agency shall take reasonable steps to determine the
identity and location of the owner, and notify him that the property is in
custody.  The owner may obtain the property only by making identification of
himself and of the property, and paying any costs incurred by the agency,
including costs for advertising or storage.
